prod_name,rating,rating_count,desc,profile,vitolas,Binder,Filler,Flavored,Has Tip,More Details,Origin,Pressed,Profile,Shapes,Sweet,Wrapper,Brand:
Sublimes,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A sublime blend.Sublimes started off as small, locally produced cigar brand in 2004. Initially hand-rolled in the Little Havana section of Miami, FL, it wasn’t too long before demand outgrew supply and production had to be moved to Esteli, Nicaragua. Sublimes cigars come dressed in an Ecuadoran Habano Rosado-Oscuro wrapper sitting atop a Honduran Habano Corojo binder and Nicaraguan Habano Criollo long-fillers. Sublimes are medium-bodied, but pack in a full host of flavors. Prepare to be seduced with nuances of nougat, caramel, spice, nuts, vanilla, and flavorful pepper. Add these to your cart for a sublime experience. Sublimes received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#25 overall) and multiple 90+ ratings, its highest being a 93. Here's what the panel had to say: ""Toasty and floral with big vanilla bean notes and hints of tea and honey. Earthy underpinnings and a nougat sweetness make this cigar balanced and delicious.""​",Medium,"['Double Robusto', 'Robusto Extra']","Corojo, Habano",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Double Robusto, Robusto Extra",No,Ecuador Habano,
Super-Premium 2nds,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 290 Ratings ,"Another superstar from the home of Punch & Hoyo!Can a second really be ""super-premium""? It would be difficult for the Villazon factory to make a bad cigar. In fact, between the likes of Punch, Hoyo de Monterrey, and Excalibur, this factory is home to some of the finest brands, produced by among the most accomplished blenders and torcedors in Central America. Super-Premium 2nds are now available in multiple sizes! Each and every size offers a savory experience, containing complex flavors and a sassy, enchanting flavor - the whole lot are hands-down winners. To me, they taste exactly like a Punch or Hoyo de Monterrey. But the beauty of it is, we’re throwing 'em out there at a price that’s up to 65% less! So that means a delicious, full-bodied experience that won’t break the bank. Each is handmade in Honduras using only choice long-fillers and wrappers. These tasty gems are one of the finest pound-for-pound values for the full-bodied cigar enthusiast.They're a super value that sells so fast it seems like we are constantly filling backorders on them.",Medium-Full,"['Perfecto', 'Rothschild']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Perfecto, Rothschild",No,Maduro,
Super-Premium Connecticut 2nds,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Gimme a Connecticut, hold the high price tag.Super-Premium Connecticut Seconds are just the ticket for everyday puffing. Despite the low price tag, not an ounce of quality has been sacrificed. No, sir, these beauties are from the factory that handles production for illustrious brands like Macanudo and Cohiba. We can't tell you exactly which brand they're seconds of, but they're the real-deal with only a slight blemish or aesthetic defect that doesn't affect the delicious flavor one bit.Overtop the mix of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers lies a Dominican binder and Ecuador Connecticut wrapper. The draw is smooth and creamy, and the flavors include mellow-medium bodied notes of leather, caramel, and cedar. Grab a bundle today, and enjoy filet mignon at chuck-roast prices. ",Mellow,['Toro'],Dominican,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut,
Super-Premium Rosado 2nds,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Rosados for the rest of us!When you get married, or get a new house, or a good promotion, you probably want to shell out for the good stuff. But what about when you’re out walking the dog? Mowing the lawn? Cleaning the gutters? You’re not going to want a super expensive cigar hanging out of your mouth while doing the chores, but you still want something that tastes good. That’s where Super-Premium Rosado 2nds come in!These beauties are handmade in the Dominican Republic by folks who take real pride in their work, folks responsible for powerhouses like La Gloria Cubana and Cohiba. They come wrapped in a Habano Sun-Grown wrapper over a Honduran binder and fillers from the Dominican, Honduras, and Nicaragua. No more settling for junk when you grab a bundle of Super-Premium Rosado 2nds, just delicious medium-bodied notes of leather, spice, and coffee at a price you can feel good about.",Medium,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Rosado,
Swag Connecticut,Rated 4.49 out of 5,,"Rock your Swag in a lighter shadeWith the influx of cigars that bombard the building as IPCPR 2015 rears its scrumptious head, it’s easy to overlook some real gems. Hundreds of new blends and line extensions can get the best of even the most cunning aficionado. But there are certain releases that you simply can’t afford to overlook. Case in point, the newest addition to the Swag portfolio, Swag Connecticut.This creation from Rafael Nodal and the team at Boutique Blends delivers everything you’d desire in a mellow to medium-bodied stick. A shade grown Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf graces its outside, with rich, vintage Dominican long-fillers plumping up its core. Refined hints of cedar, cream, and toast alternate in intensity throughout the entirety of this cool and slow-burning journey. Make sure to keep Swag Connecticut closely dialed into your radar. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Rothschild', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Rothschild, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Swag
Swisher Sweets BLK,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 59 Ratings ,"​Swisher goes pipe tobacco!Swisher Sweets enters the uber-popular arena of pipe tobacco cigarillos with Swisher BLK. Tasty, aromatic, and a fraction of the price of more well-known brands, BLK will appeal to the masses. Available in natural (Smooth) or cherry flavor, each cigarillo comes with a tip for an effortless smoke every time. My bet is once you go BLK, you'll be hard-pressed to go back to that 'other' brand. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,Yes,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,HTL,Swisher Sweets
Swisher Sweets Cigars and Cigarillos,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 196 Ratings ,"Made in the good ol’ US of A Swisher Sweets are a product of the United States, and have been one of the top-selling machine-made cigars for longer than most of us have been around. Originally made in the late 1800’s, Swisher Sweets have never stopped growing. Now before you turn your nose up, if you haven’t tried these cigars, you may like to know this is one of the most requested cigars we carry. Period. And with these prices and our fast shipping, you can save yourself a trip to the local convenience store. Ah, cigars bought from the comfort of your own home. What’s more American than that? ",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona']",,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Perfecto, Petite Corona",Varies,HTL,Swisher Sweets
Tatiana Flavored Cigarillos,Rated 4.79 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"Flavorful and aromatic!Tatiana has recently become one of our top-selling flavored cigars. It is hand-rolled in the Dominican Republic, made with Dominican fillers grown from Cuban-seed, draped in an Indonesian wrapper. The attractive packaging and enticing flavors make these flavored blends a great change of pace. The taste is smooth and mellow, with a pleasant aroma. We offer three different size cigarillos, all of which are great for a short, smooth and flavorful experience. Tatiana Flavored Cigarillos are available in these delicious varieties:Cherry - Smooth and subtle with aroma of sweet ripe cherries.Chocolate - Milk chocolate flavor with moderate tobacco. Great with a cup of coffee!Cinnamon - Infused with cinnamon and sweetness, a holiday favorite.Fusion Frenzy - A fusion of sweet, natural aromatic fruit flavors. Very enjoyable!!Groovy Blue - Berries soaked in vanilla, with acacia honey and cognac.Honey - Combination of sweet natural honey and fine tobacco. Pleasantly aromatic.Night Cap - Vanilla over Marcona almonds, Cafe Arabica and cocoa.Rum - Sweet rum flavor with hints of molasses and spice, a delicious modest cigar.Sweet Euphoria - Infusion of aromatic dried fruit with a pinch of pixie dust!Vanilla - Blend of sweet natural vanilla and premium tobacco - best selling flavor!!Waking Dream - Vanilla cream, Piedmont hazelnuts and single malt whiskey.Mint Chocolate - A blast of minty freshness followed by smooth chocolate flavors.Click here to shop the Mini Cigarillos size!",Mellow-Medium,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Indonesian,
Tatiana Flavored Cigars,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 466 Ratings ,"Flavorful and aromatic!Tatiana has recently become one of our top-selling flavored cigars.  It is hand-rolled in the Dominican Republic, made with Dominican fillers grown from Cuban-seed, draped in an Indonesian wrapper. The attractive packaging and enticing flavors like Tatiana vanilla cigars and groovy blue cigars, make these flavored blends a great change of pace. The taste is smooth and mellow, with a pleasant aroma. Available in these delicious varieties:Cherry - Smooth and tame with aroma of sweet ripe cherries.Chocolate - Milk chocolate flavor with mellow tobacco.  Cinnamon - Infused with cinnamon and sweetness, a holiday favorite.Fusion Frenzy - A fusion of sweet, natural aromatic fruit flavors. Groovy Blue - Berries soaked in vanilla, with acacia honey and cognac.Honey -  Combination of sweet natural honey and fine tobacco.Night Cap - Vanilla over Marcona almonds, Cafe Arabica and cocoa.Rum - Sweet rum flavor with hints of molasses and spice, a delicious mild cigar.Sweet Euphoria - Infusion of German chocolate, exotic fruit, and Acai Honey.Vanilla - Blend of sweet natural vanilla and premium tobacco.Waking Dream - Vanilla cream, Piedmont hazelnuts and single malt whiskey.Chocolate Mint - A blast of minty freshness followed by smooth chocolate flavors.Caribbean Chill - A refreshing blast of mint followed by Caribbean rum and citrus flavors.Harvest Moon - Warm and inviting notes of pumpkin, cinnamon and brown sugar.Cognac - Intoxicating notes fruit, sweetness, nuts, and spice. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Petite Corona, Robusto",Yes,Indonesian,
Tatiana Mocha,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Tobacco, check. Coffee, check. Delicious, check!Made by hand, these Dominican beauts offer a scrumptious blend of tobaccos carefully influenced by the soothing subtleties of chocolate, coffee, and vanilla. The chocolaty-brown Sumatra wrapper leaf will have you at hello, and that's just for starters. The flavor is deep and heavy, clinging to your palate with each puff. Delightful and silky smooth, these are anything but overpowering. There's a core of rich tobacco flavor with a faint touch of coffee and mocha. Tatiana Mocha is a tasty mellow-bodied treat built for any time enjoyment.",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona Extra', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,Honduran,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona Extra, Petite Corona, Robusto",Yes,Sumatra,
Tatuaje 10 Year Anniversary,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Tatuaje hits double digits!I'm probably dating myself, but I remember when Tatuaje first burst onto the scene. The excitement and intrigue circling the brand was high, and praise quickly followed suit. It's hard to believe that was 10 years ago....man time flies! And in that time, few have stayed as true to their roots as Pete Johnson and his brand Tatuaje. The best news is, 10 Year Anniversary is the same blend that put Tatuaje on the map a decade ago. The same blend that garnered Top 25 Cigar of the Year honors and an impressive 90-rating (quite a feat back then). The rest as they say is history. This go round, you can expect the same craftsmanship and experience delivered in a fabulous triple capped cigar forged in Esteli, Nicaragua. On the pre-light, it emanates sweet aromas of leather, spice, coffee and cocoa. Light it up and instantly lose yourself in the moment, the music....wait....I got sidetracked for a moment. [Continuing]: balanced notes of coffee, leather, and spices. Between the eye-catching bands, and gorgeous boxes, the 10 Year Anniversary definitely shows up to the ball well-dressed. More importantly, it hasn't lost an ounce of its moves either.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Perfecto', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Perfecto, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Avion,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"It's a bird. It's a plane. No it's avion!Introducing Avion by Tatuaje. Blended by Pete Johnson, Avion cigars boast the same top-notch blend as his Fausto line, but are instead crafted into a beautiful limited-edition box-pressed perfecto. Greeting you from the outside is an Ecuadorian Habano Maduro wrapper, shimmering with ample oils. Tucked just beneath this potent leaf, an equally stout array of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. Together these tobaccos strike up extraordinary results, as the tapered shape slowly unleashes an array of complex nuances. Immediate notes of pepper, leather, and earth make an appearance before bolder stronger notes of oak, espresso, cocoa, and a dense tobacco core enter the fray. Full-bodied with plenty of big-time flavor in tow, fans of full-bodied cigars make haste and sign up below. With its first release being the '11, annual releases have been on the way ever since and seem to be stepping it up a notch each year.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ​",Medium-Full,"['Double Perfecto', 'Perfecto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Double Perfecto, Perfecto",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Habano",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Black,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A Tatuaje Rarity EverydayThere's no worse feeling in the cigar world than missing out on a ""limited edition"" release. Those who follow cigar news and releases are often left out in the cold if they can't act fast enough, watching all the trendy cigar hipsters enjoying the latest and greatest blends. One of the worst offenders of this, Tatuaje Black Label, has existed in sixteen different LEs. Sixteen. But now, finally, Tatuaje has released this blend into regular production so we can all join in on the fun, without having to search high and low.Tatuaje Black Label cigars are Nicaraguan puros that immediately impress. Tatuajes have a tendency to demand top dollar, but once you pop this bottle of champagne you'll know why. A slightly oily Nicaraguan Sun-Grown wrapper invites you in with notes of coffee bean and earth. Chewy, dense flavors of sweet nougat and slight leather coat the palate, and you'll quickly understand why this one gets heaps of 90+ ratings. Tatuaje Black Label has received a few 90 ratings, and a 91-rating, noting: ""Its lush draw layers the palate with chewy dense smoke that is both sweet with nougat and hearty with coffee bean. Flavors build to a ginger snap finish."" ​The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Fausto,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"The latest from Tatuaje.Introducing Fausto (meaning 'splendor'), a daring new blend from Tatuaje. Heed my warning, the Fausto is not intended for the faint. Greeting you from the outside is an Ecuadorian Habano Maduro that shines with ample oils. Beneath this dark leaf, a hearty combination of Nicaraguan long-fillers and Nicaraguan binder awaits. Upon taking flame to foot, notes of pepper, earth and leather rush to the palate. As the burn progresses, expect additional notes of oak, espresso, and rich tobacco as a slightly peppery flavor enters the fray. A smooth, dark, and powerful cigar, the Fausto makes the perfect accompaniment to a large meal.Good news! Tatuaje Fausto has received an outstanding 93-rating and was honored as the #14 cigar on the Top 25 Cigars of 2018 list. The review noted: ""The smoke is a dense, concentrated cigar, full of coffee bean, earth, white pepper and a sweet hint of molasses.""The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Robusto Extra, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Habano Maduro,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Havana VI,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Another tasty Tatuaje for you to enjoy.Carefully hand-crafted in Nicaragua, Tatuaje Havana VI is a richly rendered Nicaraguan puro. Dark and oily, these fine cigars combine a beautiful Nicaraguan wrapper with a robust blend of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos. Patiently aged and expertly balanced, Tatuaje VI is medium in body with a smooth earthy core, rich undertones and a touch of pepper.Tatuaje Havana VI received a well-deserved 93-rating noting: ""A gorgeous little corona with a dark red wrapper. It is a black cherry bomb that is peppered with spice and leather flavors. A strong, complex cigar with a long finish.""The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Havana VI Verocu,Rated 4.93 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Cojonu gets a baby brother.Verocu was originally a limited edition line extension to the Tatuaje Havana VI brand. Considered the younger brother to the Cojonu and boasting a stronger blend than Havana VI, Verocu is being released as a regular production cigar.Coming draped in a Ecuador Habano wrapper encasing a Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers, this cigar is a show stopper.  Boasting a pristine and oily wrapper, the Verocu is expertly rolled with no soft spots. The cigar is medium to full-bodied and complex with hearty flavors of cayenne pepper, chocolate, and coffee, with no residual harshness. Tatauaje Verocu is a prime example of flawless blending and boutique manufacturing.Good news, Tatuaje Havana VI Verocu has received an awesome 90-point rating in 2018, noting: ""A dark robusto whose even draw delivers a smoke redolent of dark chocolate and cherries with hints of wood and a toasty finish.""The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Mexican Experiment II,Rated 4.93 out of 5,,"Where the drinks are hotter than the chili sauce.Mexican wrappers are something you don’t see coming from Pete Johnson too often. The first was on a super limited Monsters release, and the second came in 2011 with the limited regional line, the Mexican Experiment. About 500 bundles were made in two different sizes that shipped to retailers in Florida and New England, and these days, that cigar stands as one of the best Tatuajes ever made. And that’s saying a lot from the company that arguably does LEs better than anyone else in the biz. Now the Mexican Experiment is set to return to stores, but this time it’s regular production, and it’s here to stay.The Tatuaje Mexican Experiment II (or ME II) features the same anatomy as the original, a Mexican San Andres wrapper over Nicaraguan binders and fillers. Available in four sizes, this cigar is a powerhouse and a classic expression of Mexican tobacco flavors. A solid core of earth and chocolate is joined by pepper, wood, coffee, and clay, and features extraordinary complexity and a long, rich finish. When you pick up a box of Tatuaje ME II, you’ll agree that Pete Johnson’s Mexican Experiment was a resounding success.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,San Andres,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Miami,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"A high-end, quality super-premium.Tatuaje Miami is a highly sought after 90-rated blend made in Miami by Don ""Pepin"" Garcia. Made entirely of 1st generation Cuban-seed tobaccos grown in Nicaragua, expect a robust, medium to full-bodied blend that's leathery in character and loaded with earthy, woody undertones and pepper on the finish.Tatuaje is made in extremely limited quantities in order to maintain its ultra-high level of quality and consistency, making this one of the rarest cigars on the market. Get'em while you can.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Figurado', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,"Nicaragua, United States",Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Figurado, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Presidente, Robusto, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Ecuador Habano, Habano, Oscuro",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Monster Series - Chuck & Tiff,Rated 4.83 out of 5,,"We're friends 'til the end, remember?In the wide world of cigars, trends come and go in the blink of an eye. But among all of the small-batch, limited edition cigars out there, few have laid claim to the popularity and legacy of Pete Johnson’s Tatuaje Monsters series. Every year around Halloween, Tatuaje would release another monster upon the world to wreak havoc on cigar store shelves all over the country. These beasts were highly limited, highly sought after, and extremely delicious, and now’s your chance to get your hands on a box of the last two installments in the Monsters Series, the Chuck & Tiff.Tatuaje Chuck: Hi I’m Chuck, wanna play!? This Good Guy comes cloaked in a dark Ecuador Habano wrapper leaf concealing an all-Nicaraguan binder & long-filler blend. Medium-full bodied, this little guy packs a punch, along with earthy & rich notes of cedar, cocoa, and spice.Tatuaje Tiff: This little beauty comes wrapped in a silky Ecuador Connecticut wrapper covering Nicaraguan binder & fillers, and draws you in with a mellow body before captivating you with a full-flavored profile of caramel, citrus, and roasted nuts. Eat your heart out, Barbie!If you’ve been following the Monsters Series, you’ve seen the Chuck & Tiff in the extremely limited Pudgy & Skinny Monsters samplers, but they’re finally getting their very own full-scale release. Only 2190 boxes were made of each, and since this is the last full Monsters release, don’t miss your chance to own a piece of modern cigar history!",,['Robusto Extra'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Robusto Extra,False,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Habano",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Negociant Monopole,Rated 5 out of 5,,"This is my blend nowLet me tell you a little story: a few years back L’Atelier and My Father, Don ‘Pepin’ Garcia’s esteemed brand, had been working on a blend that was too good to pass up, but it was never put into production. This boutique gem of a blend has been patiently waiting for the right fit, until Pete Johnson came along. Released under the Tatuaje name, today we’re shining the spotlight on ‘Negociant’, the newest boutique craze from two masters of the boutique industry.  Offered up in four sizes, Negociant comes wrapped in a beautiful Ecuador Connecticut Shade wrapper – an unusual leaf for the brand. A double binder of Mexican San Andres and Nicaraguan tobacco’s secure a blend of Nicaraguan long-filler. Clocking in at a smooth medium-bodied profile, it’s a bit fuller than most Connecticut’s but maintains those sweet and creamy nuances. Tatuaje Negociant provides a great amount of complexity for a Connecticut wrapped cigar, enjoy notes of honey, tea, butter, toast, and earth.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Mexican, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Nicaragua,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Tatuaje hailing from Nicaragua.Tatuaje Nicaragua cigars are highly celebrated blends made in Nicaragua by Don ""Pepin"" Garcia, in the renowned My Father factory. Crafted entirely of 1st generation Cuban-seed tobaccos grown in the fertile soils of Nicaragua, expect a robust, medium to full-bodied cigar that's layered with subtle complexities. Bold and always on point, Tatuaje Nicaragua cigars never disappoint. Tatuaje is made in extremely limited quantities in order to maintain its ultra-high level of quality and consistency, making this one of the rarest cigars on the market. Get'em while you can.Tatuaje Cojonu Capa Especial recently received a 93-rating along with a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of the Year! In addition, the blend received a 92-rating noting: ""Gorgeously pressed with a neat, three-seam cap. The smoke on this large cigar is chewy and thick, layering rich notes of molasses and hickory into the palate.""The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Petite Corona, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Habano, Sumatra",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Nuevitas,Rated 2.5 out of 5,,"Nuevitas – Now by My Father!Back in the day, the Nuevitas line was one of the only Tatuaje cigars to not be made by the Garcia family. Today, the blends are back (unchanged by the way), but now the cigars have gone home where the Tatuajes belong. That’s right, the new version of Nuevitas features the same great blend as the original Nuevitas, now handmade under the watchful eye of Don Pepin Garcia himself. A Nicaraguan puro featuring a full flavor in a medium to full-bodied profile, Tatuaje Nuevitas features a Corojo ’99 wrapper leaf grown in Nicaragua. Featuring loads of black pepper up front, Nuevitas also mellows out into a smooth profile with notes of natural tobacco, sweetness, and rich earth. Please note – the “Jibaro” version features a shaggy foot and a slightly different band, but it’s the same cigar. ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Corojo,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Reserva,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"No reservations requiredTatuaje Reserva is a highly sought after blend made by Don ""Pepin"" Garcia. Made entirely of 1st generation Cuban-seed tobaccos grown in Nicaragua, expect a robust, medium to full-bodied blend that's leathery in character and loaded with earthy, woody undertones and pepper on the finish.Tatuaje Reserva is made in extremely limited quantities in order to maintain its ultra-high level of quality and consistency, making this one of the rarest cigars on the market. Get'em while you can.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Habano",Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Reserva Broadleaf,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Broadleaf makes the world go roundPete Johnson. It sounds like someone giving a fake name at a restaurant to be funny, but the blends the man comes up with are nothing to laugh at. Johnson’s blends are often compared to classic Cuban cigars and boast an incredible balance of strength and flavor. Manufactured at the My Father factory in Estelí, Nicaragua, the Reserva Broadleaf continues that tradition, with Nicaraguan fillers held together with a Connecticut broadleaf wrapper. This combination elicits complex hints of oak, spice, and toasted nuts. Johnson’s goal is always the best quality, so the availability of these gems is limited. Make sure your focus is appropriately adjusted on grabbing some before they run out for good. The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Series P,Rated 3.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Get ready to welcome the most affordable Tatuaje with open arms.Known for producing some of the most exquisite boutique blends on the map, Pete Johnson’s releases often go hand in hand with a premium price tag. To the relief of Tatuaje lovers far and wide and under the trained eye of Don “Pepin” Garcia, the release of Series P has made Tatuaje both savory on the palate and on the wallet! At just over three bucks a pop, Series P is a deal that screams everyday enjoyment.Crafted at the famous Tabacalera Cubana factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, Series P delivers in spades. A true Nicaraguan puro with ample flavors, this bargain line is sure to fly off the shelves. Graced by a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper, this handmade boasts a medium body, thanks in part to the Nicaraguan binder that’s stuffed to the brim with Nicaraguan fillers. Beautifully constructed, Series P opens with subtle spices mixed with oak and citrus notes. A long, cool finish delivers nuances of earth, oak, and cedar - and with such an attractive price tag, this may just be the best kept secret to date.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Skinny Monsters,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"WARNING — Giant Wall of Text incomingTatuaje’s line-up of Skinny Monsters Cigars has been nothing shy of terrifyingly terrific - and hard to track down. Each premium draws inspiration from classic horror films and offers monstrous complexity fans of Tatuaje have come to expect. Previously only offered in samplers and limited edition boxes, the Skinny Monsters are now taking on solo roles and are being made available in 25 count upright boxes. All of the monsters are included in the mix - meaning you’ll be able to select your favorite monster to enjoy exclusively. Let's check out the blends —Chuck - Wrapped in an Ecuadorian Habano leaf with Nicaraguan tobaccos at the core, this medium to full-bodied blend is perfectly balanced.Drac - Medium to full-bodied, Nicaraguan fillers are hidden inside an Ecuadorian Habano Maduro wrapper. Face - A spectacular blend of Nicaraguna fillers lie beneath a Mexican San Andres wrapper for an unforgettable experience. Frank - An indulgent offering from a mad scientist, this cigar features a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper with Nicaraguan fillers at the center. A solid medium-bodied blend.The Hyde - Nicaraguan Fillers are hidden beneath an Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper for a medium-bodied experience sure to impress.Jason - This medium to full-bodied blend sports a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper with Nicaraguan fillers underneath. An intriguing cigar with notes of dark chocolate and black pepper.Jekyll - Utilizing a Sancti Spiritus wrapper, this Nicaraguan gem exudes notes of leather, oak, and pepper. A solid medium-bodied cigar with a bevy of complexity.Mummy - A Nicaraguan Sun Grown Criollo wrapper entombs well-aged Nicaraguan fillers for an epic array of tasting notes. Medium to full-bodied with nuances of cedar, earth, and spice.Tiff - This mellow blend sports an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. Accessible to a range of enthusiasts, this cigar encompasses the palate with a plethora cedar, sweet cream, and leather flavors.  Wolf - With notes of toasted nuts, earth, and cocoa - this is one cigar you don’t want to miss. Medium to full-bodied, Wolf is wrapped in an Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper and brimming with NIcaraguan tobaccos.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium,['Lancero/Panatela'],Varied,Varied,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Lancero/Panatela,No,Habano,Tatuaje Cigars
Tatuaje Tattoo by Pete Johnson,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"This is one tattoo you certainly won’t regret.The buzz has been flying over the reintroduction of the Tatuaje Tattoo series, which originally appeared in 2011 in a limited edition version. The cigar was massively popular, and for good reason, a great blend without the boutique price tag. There is no question why the new Tattoo should be any different, seeing as how it comes with an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper and an enticing mix of Nicaraguan filler leaves. Medium bodied and bursting with notes of cocoa, leather, pepper and a slight sweetness. To Tatuaje, all we have to say is this: welcome back.The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Tatuaje Cigars
The Bourbon Cigar,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 106 Ratings ,"Cigar meets bourbon.Short of a free steak dinner, it doesn’t get a whole lot  better than a quality handmade cigar and a good stiff drink....or two. That’s why The Bourbon Cigar has been in high demand since day 1. Crafted with Cuban-seed Dominican tobaccos and a Sumatra wrapper, each cigar is imbued with Maker’s Mark bourbon. This process yields a delicious cigar exuding a wonderful sweetness along with cedar and natural tobacco. Then there’s the presentation - gorgeous tubos carefully sealed in wax. Aside from lookin' pretty, each tube is air tight requiring no additional humidification. When you put all the cards are on the table, The Bourbon Cigar is a real treat. The 10th Anniversary is crafted with a Connecticut-shade wrapper, then imbued with a top-secret blend of Maker’s Mark. Easily distinguished by the silver 10th Anniversary tag. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Petite Corona', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Petite Corona, Toro, Torpedo",Yes,"Connecticut, Sumatra",
The Glen,Rated 4.55 out of 5,,"From the people who brought you the original Bourbon Cigar and Grand Marnier cigars, Ted’s Cigars is ready to unveil its tastiest infusion yet. Using a process similar to the one used to infuse Marker’s Mark, the cigar at hand, dubbed The Glen, sports an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf and is infused with single malt Scotch whiskey. This complex process delivers a semi-sweet, refined Scotch flavor mixed with natural tobacco nuances of cream, leather, and spice. All capped by a glass tubo to ensure the flavor is maintained perfectly for when you take flame to foot, The Glen is a must-try.  ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Toro']",,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Toro",Yes,Ecuador Habano,
The Griffin's,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 65 Ratings ,"A sweet deal.Made by Davidoff, Griffin’s are subtle to medium-bodied blends rolled in the Dominican Republic. Created with a blend of Dominican long-filler and binder leaves and a beautiful, papery Connecticut shade wrapper. Best of all, if you’re familiar with the regular prices on this brand, these CI prices will knock your socks off!SMOKE magazine rated it a 4.0, saying: ""Like all Davidoff products, the Griffin’s do not lack in quality. From the delicate and expertly applied Connecticut shade wrapper, to the meticulously applied end cap, this is an elegant cigar.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Presidente', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Presidente, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
The Griffin's Cigarillos,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A sweet deal.Made by Davidoff, Griffin’s are subtle to medium-bodied blends rolled in the Dominican Republic. Created with a blend of Dominican long-filler and binder leaves and a beautiful, papery Connecticut shade wrapper. Best of all, if you’re familiar with the regular prices on this brand, these CI prices will knock your socks off!SMOKE magazine rated it a 4.0, saying: ""Like all Davidoff products, the Griffin’s do not lack in quality. From the delicate and expertly applied Connecticut shade wrapper, to the meticulously applied end cap, this is an elegant cigar.""Now you can enjoy the silky smooth flavors of The Griffin's even when you're short on time, with The Griffin's Cigarillos! Choose between the 3.7""x 20 Griffinos, or the 4""x 30 Puritos for elegance on the go.",Mellow-Medium,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Connecticut,
The Griffin's Nicaragua,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A fire spittin’ GriffinOh yeah, this Griffin’s spittin’ some fire. A favorite among the wine and cheese crowd, The Griffin’s are usually mentioned in the same breath as Ashton, Diamond Crown, and Davidoff – which makes sense because they’re made by Davidoff – and to this point have been known for their elegant and creamy flavor profile. This is where The Griffin’s Nicaragua enters the picture and brings the heat. The Griffin’s Nicaragua is the first time this brand has utilized tobaccos from Nicaragua and Honduras. Medium to full-bodied, edging towards the fuller end of the spectrum, The Griffin’s Nicaragua comes draped in a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper atop a blend of Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. You’ll be instantly hit with spice and pepper before the profile progresses to include notes of cream, cedar, hay, and coffee. If you’ve been looking for a premium, balanced, and complex medium to full-bodied blend, you won’t go wrong with The Griffin’s Nicaragua. ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Habano,
The King is Dead by AJ Fernandez,Rated 4 out of 5,,"Fixing what’s not broken.If you were following the coverage of the 2019 IPCPR Trade Show, the biggest event in the US for cigar manufacturers, you may have heard that Caldwell had a little secret. He remained pretty tight-lipped about it, and only a handful of people in the industry knew what that would be. Well now the curtain has been lifted, and Caldwell is showing off their latest creation, one that’s not even made by Caldwell in the first place.Collaboration is important in the cigar industry, and so is tasting what the other guys are producing. So when AJ Fernandez lit up a King is Dead, he got some ideas of what he would do different with the blend. It’s not that there was anything wrong with it, on the contrary, it’s an excellent cigar. But AJ felt that it deserved a Nicaraguan interpretation, a re-working of the blend using all limited Nicaraguan wrapper. The maduro wrapper and aged filler blend produce a full-bodied profile that stays true to the original, but provides an entirely new experience with spicy, earthy notes of leather and cedar. Since the tobaccos used are fairly rare even for the boutique cigar maker, they won’t be around for long. So grab a box and experience the melding of two of the greatest minds in cigars!",Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Double Toro', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Gordo, Double Toro, Toro",No,Maduro,AJ Fernandez
The Reckoning by Oliva,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Consider this your day of reckoning.Dramatic, maybe. But taking into account the full-bodied strength of Oliva's new, bold, and limited edition release, it turns out that a theatrical entrance is fully justifiable. Draped in a deeply darkened, sun grown Habano wrapper that’s jam-packed full of ultra-potent Nicaraguan ligeros, this is one powerhouse that’s not suitable for the weak of palate. But if you’ve been on the hunt for something to take your senses on a bona fide joyride, then your search is now officially over. Buckle up your safety belt and take a spin through intense notes of pepper, wood, leather, espresso, and sweet cedar. Eventful, power-packed, and well-constructed, The Reckoning by Oliva is anything but ordinary.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Oliva
The Tabernacle,Rated 4.92 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Dark, decadent, and super deliciousLike many of us, Foundation Cigar Co. Founder Nick Melillo has a strong connection to his home - in his case, that’s Connecticut. Which means, he has fondness for Connecticut tobaccos - especially the Broadleaf variety. He went biblical with his latest release, The Tabernacle and blended a seriously epic cigar. Crafted at AJ Fernandez’s La Soledad farm in Estelí, Nicaragua, Tabernacle is dressed in dark, oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. Beneath the sheets, you’ll find fillers from Estelí and Jalapa Valley. Deep and hearty notes of cocoa, leather, and black pepper make this cigar a divine offering from Foundation, with all the strength you'd expect from an AJ blend. The Tabernacle recently earned a well-deserved 90-rating, noting, ""It offers notes of rich woods, cocoa, and a hint of salt and pepper. The finish is long and sweet.""",,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,"Dominican Republic, Nicaragua",No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",Foundation Cigar Company
The Tabernacle Havana Seed CT #142,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The Foundation gets a facelift.Nick Melillo holds Connecticut Broadleaf tobacco in very high regard, and utilized the potent leaf to great effect on the original Tabernacle release, a full-bodied beauty with a deep richness and complexity. But Nick wanted to take things a step further, so Foundation developed an all-new hybrid of Havana and Connecticut-seed tobacco for their his newest brainchild - the Tabernacle Havana Seed CT #142.Clocking in at medium-full body, the Tabernacle Havana Seed CT #142 contains a complex and commanding blend of Nicaraguan and San Andres fillers cloaked in a Sun-Grown Connecticut wrapper. The heady profile is replete with dark chocolate, nuts, cinnamon, and spices that will grab your attention and have you coming back for more again and again. Whether you’re a fan of the original Tabernacle or haven’t had a chance to try the Foundation brand, you’re in for a treat with the Tabernacle Havana Seed CT #142.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Lancero', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Double Corona, Lancero, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,Foundation Cigar Company
The Upsetters,Rated 4.9 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"A top-shelf infusion like never beforeWacky packaging, an uh… inspired name, and a brand that I hadn’t personally heard of before — upon first glance I thought these cigars were destined for the bargain bin. But I’ve been wrong before, and I’m wrong here. After lighting one of these cigars up, I’m surprised to report that The Upsetters are actually pretty darn solid. And that’s no surprise when you realize the man behind these flavored cigars has been around the game for quite some time. Forgive the pun, but give these cigars a shot, and you’re sure to be anything but upset. The Upsetters is brought to you by Foundation Cigar Co., owner of 90+ ratings. Utilizing a “Caribbean Atmospheric Herbal Infusion” and a rare Jamaican leaf with perfectly aged Nicaraguan leaf, The Upsetters is an infused cigar like absolute no other. This top-grade cigar is perfect for special occasions and no matter how many cigars you have under your belt, you’re sure to find something new and amazing here. ​",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Jamaican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",Yes,"Maduro, Varied",Foundation Cigar Company
The Wise Man Maduro,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"A Most Wise DecisionIf there’s two things that Foundation Cigar Co. founder Nick Melillo loves in this world, its premium cigars and Scrabble. Well, the second one is just a guess. But when you name a cigar something like “Gueguense Maduro,” I’ve gotta assume you have a love of words. Spanish for “The Wise Man,” Gueguense is actually pronounced similar to “way-when-say.” But enough about that, let’s talk tobacco. The wrapper leaf here is a toothy beast, utilizing a San Andres Mexican Maduro wrapper to the fullest extent. Melillo selected this leaf specifically to create a line that offered a whole different level of complexity, and he most certainly achieves that goal. Lighting up The Wise Man Maduro, you’ll find sharp notes of black pepper, soft cocoa, and rich coffee. If you’re a fan of rich maduros, you better try Wise Man Maduro today. The Wise Man Maduro has earned an impressive 95-point rating and was named the #3 Cigar of 2018, noting ""It’s a flavorful blend that oscillates between the sweet and the savory. Cocoa and vanilla notes, for example, play off the tobacco’s meaty, beef-stock qualities, all integrated by an ever-present earthiness.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,San Andres,Foundation Cigar Company
Timeless Panamericana by Nat Sherman,Rated 2 out of 5,,"Bringing the Americas together, right in your humidor.It’s not exactly the return of a classic, but Nat Sherman made it much easier to get your hands on this delicious blend. Originally released in 2014 as a TAA exclusive, and only available in a select few stores around the US, the Timeless Panamericana has finally been released on a national scale for any fan of the illustrious New York-based brand. Coming covered in a gorgeous Ecuador Sumatra wrapper leaf is a full-bodied blend of Nicaraguan and Costa Rican fillers, secured with a Nicaraguan binder. The flavors are spicy and complex, and the notes of chocolate, coffee, and cedar will keep you company sparking up in New York or Ecuador, and everywhere in-between. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra']",Nicaraguan,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Robusto Extra",False,Ecuador Sumatra,Nat Sherman
Timeless Supreme,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"It’s time to try this Nat ShermanNat Sherman is a timeless name in the world of cigars. Since first opening shop in 1930, Nat Sherman has not only become a destination spot for cigar enthusiasts, but also offers up a stable of blends that rivals any on the market.Timeless Supreme is a puro comprised entirely of Nicaraguan tobaccos. This box-pressed beaut is medium-bodied with flawless construction and a smooth and dark Nicaraguan Habano wrapper over a core of robust Nicaraguan long-fillers. Upon lighting, flavors of wood and spice greet you and eventually lead to notes of cream, cocoa, cedar, and fruit. Pleasant, mellow, and complex, Timeless Supreme by Nat Sherman takes a somewhat softer approach with the usually hearty Nicaragua tobaccos, and provides a rich subtlety in the overall profile. If you’ve been in the market for a smooth and rich Nicaraguan puro, try Timeless Supreme for a truly memorable experience. Note: Timeless Supreme was formerly known as Nat Sherman Timeless Nicaraguan. We are still working our way through the previous design, so you may receive either. The cigars inside are the same, just the packaging and bands have changed. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Short Robusto, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Nat Sherman
Todos Las Dias,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"For all the daysTodos Los Dias, blended by Steve Saka of Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust Co. was released at the 2017 IPCPR show and is arguably the strongest blend in the brands portfolio. It’s a Nicaraguan puro that truly represents the heart of this countries strong and peppery tobaccos. In Saka’s words, this cigar was blended to be “an honest, hardworking cigar intended to be smoked by men who know what it means to be a cigar smoker and never give a damn about what others think”. And that’s exactly what it is. Hand crafted at the Joya de Nicaragua factory, this cigar utilizes a long-fillers from Esteli and Jalapa with a Sun Grown, Cuban-seed wrapper on the outside. It’s full-bodied and full-flavored with rich and peppery notes of baking spices, leather, and a touch of cocoa. While this is a truly magnificent creation that will leave you satisfied, be sure to enjoy this after a filling meal.Click Here  to view the rest of the Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust portfolio.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,"Nicaraguan, Sun Grown",Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Torano Casa Torano,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 93 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive steep savings on select Torano boxes! Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Tame, smooth, and exploding with flavor.If you’ve ever been to a Torano rolling event, surely you’ve burned one or two of the fresh-rolled cigars they’re handing out. Every rolling event, they roll the same cigar. An unbanded, unnamed, mellow to medium-bodied Honduran dream that could not be purchased…until now. You see, that cigar you enjoyed is a private ‘house blend’, originally created for the sole purpose of being handed out at events. But, due to consistently high accolades mixed with a steadily growing demand, the Torano family felt it was time to release this blend to the public.Enter Casa Torano – the Torano family’s house blend. Comprised of choice Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers wrapped in a golden-brown Ecuadorian-grown Connecticut shade wrapper, this Honduran treat is sure to get your taste buds going. The extremely complex blend features a variety of flavors: subtle spice, creamy sweetness, a peppery earthiness – in a nutshell, it takes your palate for a ride. Full of flavors that satisfy the boldest of palates, yet ‘soft’ enough to be enjoyed for breakfast. There’s no need to wait for Carlos to come back to town – just pick up a box today!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Torano
Torano Dominico,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 751 Ratings ,"Golden nuggets from Torano at blowout prices.Oooh child! Newly reblended, Torano’s Dominico blend is a better cigar than ever - with the juicy part being a better price than ever. How’s starting at $34.99 per bundle grab you? First off, let’s discuss the Torano family - with cigar pedigree dating back to 1916, Torano is one of the top cigar making families in the land, an unsung bunch that cranks out classic blends. Among their jewels are, of course, their eponymous Carlos Torano Tribute, 1916 Cameroon, Exodus and Virtuoso brands, but also literally dozens of other high-class contract brands such as CAO, Alec Bradley, 5 Vegas Series ’A’, and Gurkha. Dominico by Carlos Torano brings an aged blend of Dominican long-filler tobaccos cloaked in a seamless Connecticut leaf grown in Ecuador. The smoke is mellow and smooth with a creamy core, including notes of cedar, oak, and nuts. Nuttier still is CI’s price: despite 52% SCHIP taxes, we’re delivering 20 of these beauts at a wild price point. As low as a buck-seventy five per stick....all solid sizes too. A terrific, everyday handmade you’re gonna like.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Torano
Torano Exodus 1959 '50 Years',Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 375 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive steep savings on select Torano boxes! Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.The big 5-0!Exodus 1959 has been the Torano's long-time flagship brand, earning a stellar 92-rating and other top cigar honors. Named for the year the Torano family fled Cuba, their ‘Exodus’ has just reached its 50-year milestone. So to commemorate the occasion, the Toranos have worked up something truly special....Torano Exodus 1959 '50 Years'. This special edition Exodus is gorgeous, draped in a sun-grown Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper. This dark, thick leaf is responsible for a flood of rich, decadent flavors. On the inside is a specially selected mix of Nicaraguan long-fillers from the Esteli and Pueblo Nuevo regions. The combination produces a plethora of flavors including notes of cocoa, earth, spices, sweetness and a long satisfying finish. Smooth, balanced and complex, Exodus 1959 ’50 Years’ is another brilliant work from the celebrated Torano family.Carlos Torano Exodus 1959 '50 Years' received a well-deserved, 93-point rating in addition to Top 25 Cigar honors, noting: ""Rich and balanced, with toasty, nutty flavors that build in sweetness, taking on some notes of dried berries on the finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Brazilian,Torano
Torano Exodus Gold 1959,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive steep savings on select Torano boxes! Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Buckle up camper, this gratifying cigar will take you on a thrill ride! Carlos Toraño makes some of the most consistently tasty cigars around. They quietly ply ​their craft with a focus on quality, and the Exodus 1959 blend is one of their finest. Have a look at this stick. It’s hard to pull your eyes away from the wrapper - it hugs the filler blend like a river of dark chocolate. Gorgeous. After lighting, a blast of creamy, slightly spicy greets you, followed by some slightly chocolatey note. Medium to full-bodied, it’s composed of an Habana 2000 wrapper accompanied by a complex, five-country blend of Dominican, Honduran, Mexican, Nicaraguan, and Costa Rican tobaccos.In addition to Top 25 honors and several 90+ ratings, Exodus Gold 1959 received a well deserved 92-point score, noting: ""Wonderful texture on this dark, box-pressed beauty. It is woody and toasty with a solid black cherry note and hints of cedar. Rich, balanced and elegant.",Medium-Full,"['Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Double Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habana 2000,Torano
Torano Hogshead,Rated 4.1 out of 5, Based on 127 Ratings ,"Hogs...what?Look, I’m not here to argue the fine points of cigar naming, but I’m also not above serving up an impromptu history lesson. Plus, this one makes perfect sense. A hogshead, besides just being served on a silver platter with an apple in its mouth, is a large wooden barrel in which tobacco or alcohol was transported and stored back when great great grand pappy was still around. This not only made lugging product from place to place easier, it also allowed whatever was inside to marry and age. And now that I’m done playing professor, welcome the newest member of the Torano family: Hogshead. Just as the name implies, expect a well-balanced handmade equipped with ample flavor.  Torano Hogshead brings deep flavors in spades, thanks to a three country blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Pennsylvanian filler leaves. This hearty, dense core is then met with a thick Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper leaf. The end result is a complex, rich display that’s slightly spicy, issuing notes of coffee, earth, and pepper. Medium to full-bodied, and brimming with rustic old school charm (check out the awesome burlap packaging), this one is going to make some waves in a jiffy. The highly enjoyable price tag is merely icing on the cake. Sweet, delicious icing….oh yes.",Medium-Full,"['Presidente', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Presidente, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Torano
Torano Noventa,Rated 4.19 out of 5, Based on 443 Ratings ,"In a word: Epic.I’m so excited I can barely type. This here’s a one-in-a-lifetime kinda deal. The kind you dream of, the kind that most definitely won’t last long - Torano Noventa boxes, nearly 80% off. Yes, 80 PERCENT. Torano…the name has been synonymous with premium cigars for just about a century. Charlie Torano, the man at the helm of this steamboat of delicious handmade goodness, is a fourth generation in the tobacco industry who has inherited a passion for the leaf, and lucky for us, he retains the knowledge and wisdom of his fore-fathers. At hand today, the culmination of years of tireless study in the fields, and hours of meticulous blending strategies. Enter, Torano Noventa. The Noventa was carefully crafted to celebrate the Torano family’s 90 years of tobacco growing and cigar-making. A Nicaraguan puro, the Noventa is expertly blended using a vintage mixture of premium, 5-year-old Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos from four growing regions, wrapped in a thick and oily Habano Nicaraguan leaf. Aged further after rolling, the Noventa achieves a rich and robust experience that’s smooth and perfectly balanced. A luxurious medium-bodied super-premium from the Torano family.",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Torano
Torano Reserva Decadencia,Rated 4.95 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive steep savings on select Torano boxes! Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.A revolutionary cigar.Aside from being one of the oldest and most celebrated families in the cigar business, the Toranos have always been known for innovative practices. First introducing the Cuban-seed to the Dominican Republic, the frequent use of premium tobaccos outside of Central America, and now Reserva Decadencia. Hand-crafted in Honduras, this mellow-bodied blend employs a well-aged mixture of Honduran, Dominican, and Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos hugged by a sultry Connecticut shade wrapper. In fact, this is the same blend as their top-selling, mellow-bodied masterpiece Reserva Selecta. However, these superior tobaccos are patiently aged in French Oak Barrels used for a sumptuous chocolate port, enhancing the flavors of each leaf into something very special. A smooth, creamy core of rich tobacco flavors mingles with notes of cocoa, with a sweet, velvety influence. A delicious cigar unlike any other on the market today.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto",Varies,Connecticut,Torano
Torano Vault D-042,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"Straight from the book of secrets....Here’s the scoop: the Torano family has this super top secret book of blends that dates all the way back to 1982. Inside, they have top secret formulas and theories, from blends of times past to future concepts that haven’t seen the light of day. Well, most recently, they tapped into this treasure trove of ideas and released Vault Blend A-008, which turned out to be a huge success. Torano Vault D-042 was originally concocted based on a rare and flavorful Pennsylvania Broadleaf. Anxious to incorporate this leaf, but not sure where to utilize it, they stuck the idea in their book ‘o treasures. Now, it’s here and well worth the wait. Vault D-042 is dressed in a flawless Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, with a blend of Nicaraguan and Pennsylvania Broadleaf long-fillers. The overall experience is both spicy and sweet, coating the palate with a fantastic array of well-balanced flavors of coffee and tobacco. The overall construction of this full-bodied gem is exceptional. Take a peek inside the Torano family blend bible with Vault D-042.Torano Vault D-042 received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""The wrapper of this oily torpedo is dark and smooth. An underlying nuttiness becomes sweeter, leaving light impressions of cinnamon and chocolate on the palate.""",Full,['Torpedo'],Habano,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Ecuador Habano,Torano
Toscanello,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Tastier than Italian cooking! I’m sure a few of you out there are more than familiar with the Toscano brand, and are skipping right over this text to hit that add to cart button. For those who haven’t seen these cigars before, let me give you the skinny. Toscano, and the Toscanellos, are Italian cigars made from a mix of Italian and Kentucky grown tobacco. As you might guess from the packaging, you’re not going to see these on any ‘Top Cigar’ lists. But don’t pass them up — for the money, Toscanellos are a delicious, quick shot of flavor. These half-cheroot sticks have a Connecticut wrapper to smooth things out, while the Italian and Kentucky tobaccos provide an intense wood and BBQ note. There’s some sweetness, but don’t dig in for too much complexity here. These guys are perfect for the drive home, or mowing the lawn. If you want a #1 cigar, look elsewhere. If you’re just trying to stretch that dollar to the max, Toscanello is the right choice.​",Mellow-Medium,['Cigarillos'],,"Italian, Kentucky Fire-Cured",Varies,No,More Details,Italy,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,"Connecticut, Kentucky Fire-Cured",
Toscano,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"Straight outta ItalyToscano cigars are the original Italian made choice, produce in Tuscany, Italy. They use a blend of Italian tobaccos and fermented Kentucky leaf to bring a rich flavor unlike anything you’ve found before. Now, let’s be real. I’m not going to try to trick you into thinking these are top-shelf worthy premiums because of their backstory. But when you take a look at the price, you’ll quickly understand why these suckers are so popular in the European market. And I have to admit, they taste damn good. There’s a rich flavor on display here, with BBQ tanginess, smoky wood, and a sweet chocolate note. The flavor on these is on point, the price is right, the packaging is perfect for camping, or for leaving a few in your car. What are you waiting for? ​",Medium-Full,['Double Perfecto'],,,False,No,More Details,Italy,No,,Double Perfecto,No,Kentucky Fire-Cured,
Toscano Stilnovo,Rated 4.7 out of 5,,"No humidification needed!! No, you read that right. It's true! Toscano cigars, the original Italian made choice, have made history with Toscano Stilnovo, the first premium hand-rolled cigar that requires no humidification. I know, I know, this sounds like some massive smoke and mirror scheme to get you to purchase these gems right? Well, allow me to clear the air for you. Okay, come closer and listen closely. The secret is...fire curing. That's it! So simple, and yet, so amazing. Toscano starts with their traditional four-year old Italian-cured Kentucky tobacco, wraps it lovingly in an Italian grown Kentucky fire-cured binder, which up until now, has not been done by this company. The final step, taking this intriguing combination and encasing it inside, yep...you guessed it, an American Kentucky fired-cure wrapper. So, what does this mean for flavor? You're still going to have the traditional BBQ tanginess, smoky wood, and sweet chocolate notes that Kentucky fired-cured is known for mixed with some red pepper notes that brings both a sweet, and spicy, medium-bodied experience to your palate. The best part of these cigars is that because each piece of tobacco is fired-cured, you can store them just how they come, with no humidor needed. In fact, several of us here at CI have these just sitting on our desks tempting us on a daily basis to enjoy them. So, now that the magician has revealed the secret, what are you waiting for?  Grab some of these unique Italian delights before they disappear!        ",Medium,['Lonsdale'],,"Italian, Kentucky Fire-Cured",False,,More Details,Italy,No,,Lonsdale,No,Kentucky Fire-Cured,
Trader Jack's Kickin' Cigars - Midnight,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"The sun never sets on amazing flavor!When you’re in the mood for some easy inexpensive puffin’ on a nice, sunny day, or some tropical flavors to warm your soul when winter comes around, there’s one name that stands above the rest - Trader Jack’s. Their brightly colored, resealable packages are ubiquitous in cigar shops in the US, and now there’s a new member of the Trader Jack’s family. Introducing the Trader Jack’s Kickin’ Cigars Midnight.Trader Jack's Kickin' Cigars Midnight comes with the same filler blend and tropical flavoring as the original, but swaps the Connecticut wrapper with dark, rich Connecticut Broadleaf. This dark leaf produces a heavier body and more natural sweetness that pairs perfectly with the night time, or any time you’re craving some deep, chewy flavors. Prepare yourself to party all night long with Trader Jack's Kickin' Cigars - Midnight!Note: This is a newly released product debuting at the 2019 IPCPR Trade Show. Shipping is expected to complete later this year, so get your preorders in today!",Mellow-Medium,['Lonsdale'],,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",True,False,More Details,United States,False,,Lonsdale,True,Connecticut,
Trader Jack's Kickin' Cigars - Sunrise,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"It’s a new day for Trader Jack’s!Among all of the inexpensive aromatic cigars, Trader Jack’s stands as the most ubiquitous. The jars and bags can be found in just about any shop across the US, and their bright packaging and delightful tropical flavors have been delighting cigar fans for years. They’ve never been overly strong, but now the folks at JC Newman Cigars have returned from the drawing board with an even mellower version of the island cigar you love. Introducing Trader Jack’s Sunrise!Trader Jack’s Sunrise comes equipped with a silky smooth shade-grown wrapper over the same blend of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan fillers as the original. Still made in the US and featuring the tropical flavorings you know and love, this is a delicious aromatic cigar best suited for the morning. The resealable packaging ensures you don’t need to fuss with a humidor, but let’s be honest- you won’t hold on to them long enough to need one!",Medium-Full,['Lonsdale'],,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",True,False,More Details,United States,False,,Lonsdale,True,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Trinidad Espiritu,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A return to the Age of Aquarius.The late ‘60s and early ‘70s were a strange time to be alive, but a great time be a cigar fan. This era is referred to by some as the ‘golden years’ of tobacco, specifically in reference to the fantastic blends coming out of the Caribbean at the time. Now the iconic heritage brand Trinidad is pairing up with the great AJ Fernandez to produce a Nicaraguan puro reminiscent of the spirit of cigar excellence from those years, and they named it the Trinidad Espiritu.The Trinidad Espiritu contains all Nicaraguan tobacco carefully blended to speak to the soul and hearken back to the delightful island cigars of yesteryear. The packaging is a true representation of vintage Caribbean culture, and the cigars are medium-full bodied and satisfyingly full in flavor. If you’re looking for rich, chewy flavors of pepper, citrus, vanilla, and toast in perfect harmony, you’ll want to grab a box of Trinidad Espiritu today. No time machine or passport required.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Trinidad Reserve,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"Delivers to a 'T'.Trinidad Reserve is dark, oily, and offers quite a nice kick. It also happens to look divine.....but enough drooling for now. Initial puffs are dominated by bold notes of pepper and spice, and that's just the beginning. Additional hints of cedar, cocoa, leather, and earthy undertones enter the fray within a full-bodied profile. Thick and chewy, the flavors coat the palate in a balanced yet robust fashion. A stout brew, this recipe undoubtedly gets its simmer from the wrapper. A Cuban-seed Ecuadorian leaf fermented to perfection is draped over the outside. This leaf embraces a Nicaraguan binder along with aged Honduran and Nicaraguan fillers. All in all, it's hands down one of Trinidad's best offerings. Go ahead and give it the old college try, you'll be happy you did. ",Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Habano,
Trinidad Santiago,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Domo-arigato-DR tobaccoWhen Boutique Blend’s Rafael Nodal joined Altadis after creating Aging Room, we knew there’d be some exciting new cigars on the market. But perhaps no one was prepared for Trinidad Santiago — a Dominican puro blended by Nodal himself, that delivers a Cuban-heritage flavor profile of the highest degree. Nodal didn’t make this one alone, though — each of the tobaccos included was grown by José “Jochy” Blanco himself in the Cibao Valley of the Dominican Republic.Trinidad Santiago is rolled at Blanco’s Tabacalera Palma factory in the DR, where Nodal previously made his Aging Room blends. The 100% Dominican blend includes notes of sweet cream, cedar, and hints of black pepper. It’s a medium-bodied blend that’s incredibly full in flavor, and one you should most certainly check out if you’ve ever enjoyed one of Nodal’s releases.Good news, Trinidad Santiago has earned a well-deserved 92-point rating and was honored as one of the Top 25 Cigars of 2018. The review noted, ""full of earth, coffee and licorice notes that transition elegantly into a honeyed, woody finish that kept us wide awake the entire time.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Dominican,
Ugly Coyote,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"Delicious when you're pressed for time.While these mangy mutts aren’t easy on the eyes, Ugly Coyote cigarillos prove to the maxim that looks aren’t everything. In fact, once you see the beauty that lies inside, you’ll be greeted with one of the most enjoyable bargains on the market. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Honduran,
Umbagog,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Oh-my-gawd UmbagogHailing from Steve Saka’s Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust company is Umbagog, a superb everyday cigar. This bargain for your buck premium derived from the Mi Querida cigar. Mi Querida, described by Saka as “an expression of the greatest value possible for the hardcore cigar enthusiast”, is rolled in a Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro wrapper that was not up to par for this prestigious cigar. What was judged as ""too ugly"" for one cigar brought about this robust and reliable addition to Saka’s portfolio. Named after Saka’s favorite fishing lake in New Hampshire, Umbagog is the perfect companion for all your outdoor activities. A Nicaraguan cigar immaculate in quality and taste with an affordable price point to match. And with a name as fun to say as Umbagog, you can’t go wrong with this everyday cigar.Click Here to view the rest of the Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust portfolio.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Uncle Buck,Rated 4.08 out of 5, Based on 132 Ratings ,"This Deck Is Stacked In Your FavorAlright, let's be honest. When this cigar landed on my desk, I was... less than enthused. I thought maybe the delivery guy dropped it on his way up the stairs, so I went down to the warehouse, and, nope. They all look mangled. BUT — it actually lit up and burnt pretty damn well. I'm not going to try to convince you this cigar will win any awards. As a matter of fact, I'd bet my life savings this never receives a rating. Be that as it may, for 20 bucks, you could do a helluva lot worse. The flavor is smooth and consistent, delivering an easy draw and a natural tobacco flavor that is perfect for a morning commute. If you're looking for a top-shelf recommendation, move on. If you want something pretty good that'll only cost you a buck a pop - Uncle Buck's your man. ",Mellow-Medium,['Double Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Double Corona,No,Connecticut,
Varina Farms Breakfast Blend,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"Smooth, crisp, and creamy. Look, I'll be the first to admit, it's easy to get caught up in the sleek n' shiny packing of some of our industry’s more 'marketable' brands. But what's most difficult is identifying a great cigar, that's a great cigar for actually being a great cigar. And I think this new guy fits the bill rather well. In a word, it's simple. But that's much of the charm - rustic packaging, a classic line up of sizes, and most importantly, a high-quality cigar that's well-blended and damn tasty.Varina Farms debut Breakfast Blend comes dressed in a silky-smooth US-grown Connecticut Shade wrapper which conceals a rich, well-aged mixture of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and Dominican long-fillers. The result is crisp, creamy blend that's brimming with notes of oak, toasty tobacco, coffee, pepper, and a touch of sweetness on the finish. Smooth all the way down and mellow to medium in body, this aptly named handmade has plenty of flavor without any unnecessary bite.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Vega Magna by Quesada,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Quesada’s love story to the Dominican First, there was Casa Magna. Now, Manuel “Manolo” Quesada Jr. releases a blend of Dominican blend in three sizes that he’s dubbed “Vega Magna.” It’s a masterpiece of a line that could only be produced by a tobacco legend – featuring leaves from as early as 2001, sorted and fermented with extreme care in tercio aging over long periods of time, it’s suffice to say that Vega Magna is most unique. Each size is offered up in limited edition boxes of 10 with artwork made by Pragmy Marichal, a famed artisan from the DR. Up top, you’ll find a Sun-Grown Ecuadorian wrapper leaf overtop three varietals of Dominican long-fillers. The result is an extraordinarily complex blend, with a full-bodied profile of cocoa, dried fruits, and hints of cedar. This cigar is offered as an ongoing item, but be warned – due to the meticulous quality control standards of Quesada, only one pair of rollers is producing the cigar, so production is limited. Grab some now, or risk missing out. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Quesada Cigars
VegaFina,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"A classic through and through.VegaFina cigars are hand-crafted in the Tabacalera de Garcia factory in the Dominican. Here, a silky Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper is draped over a long-filler core of Dominican, Colombian, and Honduran tobaccos secured by an Indonesian binder. The cigar is right below a medium-bodied profile, producing creamy velvety flavor. Its smooth texture is complemented by a bouquet of nuts, leather, cedar, and a crisp slightly sweet finish. The cherry on top is a wonderful aroma. In short, VegaFina cigars are a great any time of day offering that don't skimp on a single thing.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Colombian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
VegaFina Nicaragua,Rated 2 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Nicaragua fosters another champion.It safe to say VegaFina has taken the European cigar market by storm. It’s relaxing and enjoyable flavor profile has gained favor of the palates across the pond, and finally, it has made that long journey stateside. Already well on its way to cigar stardom in the U.S., VegaFina’s next offering dives head first into the Nicaraguan cigar scene.Utilizing a wrapper, binder, and filler all hailing from a variety of the most fertile growing regions Nicaragua has to offer, this Nicaraguan puro showcases just what the country’s reputation is all about. At hand, a carefully selected mix of visos, secos, and ligeros are rationed perfectly in this one delicious blend. Nicaraguan long-fillers from Jalapa and Esteli are cloaked by a Cuban-seed, hybrid Habana 2000 wrapper leaf promoting rich notes of cedar, sweet-spice, and coffee. Extremely enjoyable and excitingly affordable, don’t miss out on these beauties.​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habana 2000,
Victor Sinclair 20th Anniversary,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Cheers to 20 years!The new creme de la creme of Victor Sinclair is here! After two decades of delivering wallet-friendly, yet oh-so-tasty blends, Jose Dominguez (master blender of VS) has created his masterpiece. Just do me a favor - don't sleep on this one. Quantities are extremely limited, and if you miss out you'll be living in a world of regret. Wrapped in a gorgeously toothy Habano Ecuador leaf, this five-country cocktail is intricately balanced and smooth. Toasting each perfectly handcrafted specimen, you'll find rich, sweet nuances along with notes of earth, pepper, and an enjoyably creamy finish. Truly one of the finest blends to ever come out of the Victor Sinclair factory, 20th Anniversary is a must-try for anyone who loves handmade cigars. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Bohemian Bamboo,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 183 Ratings ,"Big-ring, bigger savings.Victor Sinclair’s Bohemian ""Bamboo"" series is aesthetically beautiful, draped in a delicious, super-smooth Connecticut shade wrapper. Paired with a delicious blend of aged Dominican long-fillers, this mellow to medium-bodied blend delivers a rich and flavorful profile that’s smooth, creamy, and brimming with notes of cedar, pepper, and coffee. Take all of this delicious Connecticut-wrapped goodness, roll it out in a massive 6” x 60 vitola and you’ve got something truly special. Here it is, complete with a generous 67% savings.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Connecticut,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Bohemian Black Oscuro,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Don't be afraid of the dark! The Bohemian Black by Victor Sinclair is simply gorgeous. Big thick cigars covered by an extremely dark, oily wrapper complete with the well-known Bohemian pig-tail cap and shaggy foot. And yes, it tastes as good as it looks. Filled with premium Dominican long-filler bound by a tasty 5 year old olor binder, you'll find this hearty looking cigar surprisingly mellow. The complex flavor offers some smooth toasted nut flavors while billowing out clouds. This dog's bark is definitely meaner than its bite, as the Bohemian Black is a delicious subtle to medium bodied cigar.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Oscuro,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Bohemian Original Brazilian,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Big, burly cigars available in an array of awesome shapes.
Bohemian is a beauty hand-rolled in the Dominican Republic, offering an array of unusual sizes and a wonderful, unmatched taste. From the gargantuan Big Sur to the short torpedo shaped Whitman, I can’t say enough good things about the Bohemian line. Made with a 5 year old Olor binder, Dominican long-filler and a beautiful dark black Brazilian maduro wrapper. Created in the Cuban style, with an unfinished foot and twisted ""rat tail"" top, each is presented in a clear top box in a bed of Brazilian tobacco leaves. A wonderfully flavorful and nutty profile, right around medium-bodied. Try a box today!",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Bohemian Red Corojo,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Attractive corojos.The Bohemian Red is a complex blend hand-rolled in the Dominican Republic by cigar maker Jose Dominguez. It offers a unique, full-bodied flavor with a very interesting, robust character that comes from its genuine Corojo wrapper. Beautifully constructed of fine long-fillers from Nicaragua, Brazil and the Dominican Republic. This enticing cigar is medium-bodied in strength with some oomph!",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Cigarillos,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 594 Ratings ,"Cigarillos from Victor Sinclair at unthinkable prices.They ain't flashy, but they sure taste good and our price is absurd. 100 hand-rolled cigars, un-banded and packaged in bulk boxes of 100, are yours for as low as $54.99. Handmade in the Dominican Republic utilizing a mellow blend of Dominican tobaccos and your choice of a Candela or golden-brown Connecticut wrapper. The result is a smooth and flavorful 15-20 minute smoke that's perfect any time of day. And as an added bonus, they're offered in two different styles – natural or a slightly sweetened version. These little cigars are tasty for sure....and at just 55-cents apiece, you'd be hard-pressed to find a better deal anywhere. Victor Sinclair Cigarillos are now available in a Cheroot format, meaning they are open on both ends. No cutter needed!",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Connecticut, Habano",Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Clasicos,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 324 Ratings ,"We’ve all fallen victim to them before – big, overhyped promises that were no fish and all batter. All grease and no bacon. All treble and no bass. Well, this deal is the exact opposite of that. For over a decade now, Jose Dominguez and his Dominican-based Victor Sinclair brand have been the kings of value, but you best have a seat before I break down his latest offering, because this may be his best work yet. Gorgeous, long-filler Dominican handmades are making their big debut at even more attractive price points!And the options! You can take your pick of two wrapper varieties and four generous sizes, all coming to you at bare bones prices. The golden-brown Connecticut wrapper version is positively brimming with crisp, creamy notes of oak, coffee, sweetness, and toasty tobacco, and boasts a mellow to medium body. If you’d prefer to go richer, the maduro includes a dark, naturally fermented wrapper leaf and is medium-bodied. Rich, complex nuances of dark chocolate, pepper, cedar, and sweetness swiftly satisfy any maduro enthusiast.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Maduro",Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Connecticut Yankee,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 119 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.A genuinely unique cigar.Victor Sinclair's Connecticut Yankee features a Connecticut-grown Havana-seed leaf. Genuine Connecticut-grown, Havana-seed leaf is not common, as it is neither broadleaf nor shade-grown. However, 4 years ago Victor Sinclair purchased a small, experimental cache of this rare wrapper tobacco....and the results are nothing short of delicious. Indeed, the wrapper delivers a distinctively smooth, rich flavor. And combined with its premium blend of aged Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, Connecticut Yankee offers a medium-bodied experience with a unique, mature bouquet of flavor including some rich, toasty and chocolatey notes.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano Connecticut,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Fusion,Rated 4.32 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"Don’t miss last call.Master blender Jose Dominguez has been captivating CI Nation with his dizzying array of handmade, flavorful blends. From the best-selling Don Rafael cigars to the crowd pleasing Victor Sinclair Bohemian lineup, there is a Dominguez-made blend for every palate. Now Jose is doing a cannonball into the flavored cigar pool with his latest creation, Victor Sinclair Fusion, combining our 2 favorite pastimes, cigars and booze.Victor Sinclair Fusion comes dressed in a Connecticut wrapper atop a blend of choice Dominican fillers. Pleasantly mellow-bodied, and with the added essence of some favorite cocktails, these handmades are a flavorful showstopper. If you enjoy a nice adult beverage along with a cigar, you must try Victor Sinclair Fusion - the best of both worlds.Rum & Cola - Rich Caribbean rum spliced with America’s favorite sodaTequila Sunrise - A citrus and tequila flavor bombWhipped Cream Vodka - Premium vodka with a sweet whipped cream finish",Mellow,['Corona'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,Yes,Connecticut,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Primeros,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 500 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.An eye-catching, mellow-bodied gem from the Dominican.For those seeking a mellow-bodied cigar but with ample flavor, one that is priced right and consistent time after time, Primeros answers the bell. Loaded with smooth, creamy flavors, this pleasantly mellow cigar features a golden brown Connecticut wrapper and an aged filler blend of Dominican Seco tobaccos with a sliver of Ligero. A handmade tame enough for rookie palates yet enough finesse and flavor to satisfy you grizzled veterans too.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Serie '55' Corojo Petites,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"Tasty little things.Victor Sinclair Serie '55' is an exquisite cigar utilizing a 5 country blend of tobaccos and an extensive 5 year aging process, hence the '55' name. The Corojo variety is wrapped in a gorgeous dark Corojo leaf, and offers an incredibly smooth, complex, medium to full-bodied blend. Delicious, no doubt, and these convenient, bite-sized Petites make it even better.",Medium,['Cigarillos'],Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Brazilian,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Serie '55' Imperial Connecticut,Rated 4.37 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Hold the applause.The third installment of the storied Serie ‘55’ Imperial collection has finally arrived, and an educated guess based on 20 years in the biz tells me that this smooth operator is going to sell like hot cakes. Connecticut-wrapped, densely-filled, and as decadently smooth as they come. Victor Sinclair Serie 55 Connecticut sticks to the Serie 55 game plan, taking premium tobaccos and pairing them with overly reasonable prices. The result is a dynamo that has our purchasing department working in overdrive. Give this ultra-creamy addition to the Victor Sinclair lineup a try and save some hard earned cash while you’re at it. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Serie '55' Imperial Habano,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Pure premium goodness is the name of the game.Ok, let's be honest, Victor Sinclair undeniably creates the hottest, most affordable, cigars in the business.  Here at CI, we have a difficult time keeping these popular brands in stock. With that being said, we challenged Jose Dominguez, to create an uber-premium blend that we could still deliver to the masses at a great price. And boy did he deliver. While all of his blends thus far have been solid, this one takes things up a notch and catapults the brand into the big leagues. Dare I say, this one belongs on your top ten list? Maybe so! One little taste and you’ll swiftly agree.VS 55 Imperial Habano delivers some serious flavor. Each one is packed to the gills with notes of espresso, oak, leather, earth, and sweet cream. It’s well balanced and complex, thanks to the blend of tobacco leaves from the best growing regions within five unique countries and have been patiently aged for five long years. This is one Habano-wrapped lovely that’s sure to please. ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Brazil,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Serie '55' Imperial Maduro,Rated 4.23 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Substitute my Habano for Maduro.The triumph of Victor Sinclair’s Serie '55' Imperial Habano cannot be denied. An ultra-premium blend at an attractive price point is a recipe for success. Forward a few years and a gaggle of followers later, Jose Dominguez thought it time to expand on this magnificent concoction.Welcome Victor Sinclair Serie ‘55’ Imperial Maduro, a heartier, chewier version of this already scrumptious treat. Substituting in a Pennsylvania Broadleaf Maduro wrapper for the well-known Habano, Jose has created a medium to full-bodied snack for all to enjoy. Inside your can find a five country cocktail of well-aged tobaccos, combined they produce complex and rich notes of coffee, chocolate, and pepper. It’s up to you to decide for yourselves if this gem outdoes its predecessor, and the odds are darn good.  ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Triple Corojo,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 145 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Scrumptious!Whether you’re a fan of Corojo tobaccos or just looking for a flavorful, satisfying cigar, I advise securing an order of these handmades pronto. Called Triple Corojo because it’s 100% Corojo - wrapper, binder, and fillers. The result is a firecracker booming with chewy, rich, hearty flavors. A smooth, feisty bouquet of earthy flavors and ample spice. Full-bodied.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Vintage Doppel Gordo,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 76 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.An absolute beast booming with buttery-smooth flavors.Call it a behemoth. Call it a monstrosity. We’ll call it 90+ minutes of pure, unadulterated cigar-burning goodness. These gently box-pressed Doppel Gordos measure 6.0”x70 (say whaa??), a special small-batch production within the top-selling Vintage Maduro line from Victor Sinclair. A dense, epically-proportioned handmade that sits (very) heavy in the hand and comes jam-packed with tasty tobaccos. Dark Brazilian wrappers are hand-selected, extra-fermented, and carefully draped overtop a patiently aged blend of Dominican Piloto Cubano long-fillers. The result: buttery-smooth layers of flavor. Rich tobacco, dark chocolate, roasted coffee, and so much more....delivered in a deep, concentrated fashion that’s balanced and surprisingly mellow throughout. The super-slow burn is cool and methodic, letting you truly appreciate every last nuance at play.",Medium,['Gordo'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,Gordo,No,Brazilian,Victor Sinclair
Victor Sinclair Vintage Select,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 108 Ratings ,"For a limited time, enjoy an additional $10 off our already low prices on Victor Sinclair's best-selling handmades. Discount is automatically reflected in prices shown below.Milk-chocolatey goodness from Victor Sinclair.Victor Sinclair Vintage Select offers a dark, delicious Brazilian maduro wrapper and supremely aged mix of all Cuban-seed Dominican long-leaf tobaccos. Fire one up and you'll see it's chock full o' soothingly rich, milky-smooth flavors but also fairly tame in strength. Crisply box-pressed and meticulously constructed with a pleasant aroma and slight sweetness, VS Vintage is a bargain that's priced well enough to be your 'everyday' handmade. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Churchill, Gordo, Lonsdale, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Victor Sinclair
Villazon Maduro,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 236 Ratings ,"Villazon, victorious and vindicated!A formidable dominion of premium cigars and guardian of the world’s most legendary brands, the Villazon factory has been a key piece of the cigar industry for years. Within these walls, skilled artisans first created blends worth of donning the names Punch, Hoyo de Monterrey and Excalibur, just to name a few. The Villazon factory name may have changed to HATSA, but the time honored tradition remains. The Maduro version comes with an impressively oily wrapper leaf, shining with flavor. Toasting the foot, you’ll find hearty, toasty notes of warm tobacco, crisp peppery spice, and hints of dark chocolate.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Colombian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,
Villazon Natural,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 151 Ratings ,"Enter the new king of bundled cigarsThe Villazon factory has long been associated with formidable and dominant brands, from the original non-Cuban Punch, to Hoyo de Monterrey, to the uber-popular Excalibur. In short, you might not know the name, but you’ve absolutely had the cigars. Now, the Villazon factory has produced a bundle bearing its own name, and the cigars are just as amazing as the brands listed previously… but without the high price tag. Villazon Natural features a choice Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper aged for years to reach the ideal conditions. Underneath, a Broadleaf Maduro binder encompasses Honduran, Dominican, and Colombian filler tobaccos to create a complex medium-bodied blend. Each puff gives way to a balanced and smooth profile with natural tobacco sweetness, cream, and slight hints of black pepper. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Colombian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Villiger 125th Habano,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"Over a century of VilligerThough the name may not be as familiar to us Americans, Villiger cigars are incredibly popular across the world. Though they’re perhaps best known for their machine-made cigars, you’d be doing yourself a disservice to ignore their premium handmade products. Take for example the 93-rated #10 Cigar of the Year, Villiger Flor de Ynlcan. Or, in this case, the Villiger 125th. Villiger 125th features an Ecuadorian 2009 Habano wrapper leaf over Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers. Lighting this up, you’ll be greeted with flavors of pure, rich earth, slight spice, and hints of black pepper. It’s a complex bevy of flavors that keeps things interesting down to the nub, making this Villiger a cigar you can surely put your chips behind. ",Medium,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Habano,Villiger
Villiger 1888,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"A blast from the pastA 90-rated gem with a beautifully complex bouquet, Villiger 1888 is a medium-bodied cigar made up of top choice long-fillers from the Dominican and Nicaragua and wrapped with a chestnut brown Ecuador Connecticut leaf. This premium’s packed with indulgent notes of roasted nuts, pepper, and baking spices - a truly delicious cigar from beginning to end. Sure to become a staple humidors near and far, stock up before they sell out.",Mellow-Medium,['Gordo'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Villiger 1888 Fuerte,Rated 4.6 out of 5,,"1888, Fuerte-style.Industry legends at Villiger are diving into the handmade section of the biz head-first. After the warm reception of Villiger 1888, they have tweaked the blend ever-so-slightly to deliver a mellow to medium-bodied treat that has flavor in droves,  spot-on construction, and a balance that would give Philippe Petit a run for his money.Dubbed Villiger 1888 Fuerte, this release substitutes in a delicate San Andres wrapper for the original’s Ecuadorian Connecticut. Beneath the sheets you’ll find a rare, Cuban-seed Peruvian Habano binder hugging long-filler ligeros from the Dominican and Nicaragua. Slight floral notes are at play, with refined hints of coffee, oak, and earth that round-out the finish. A sure-bet winner, it’s about time you give this hidden gem a go.​",Mellow-Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Peruvian,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Villiger Braniff,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 19 Ratings ,"- A long, European cigarillo- An interesting blend of Java, Virginia, Burley, and Maryland tobaccos- No.2 size is box-pressed and features a Mexican wrapper- No.3 size is richer, stronger, and features a Maduro wrapper- Smooth, rich, slightly aromatic flavor- Made in Switzerland by Villiger",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,No,"Maduro, San Andres",Villiger
Villiger Colorado,Rated 4 out of 5,,"This is a sturdy, solid, dependable offering from Villiger, a company that’s been churning out cigars since 1888. Medium in body and equipped with just enough spice to keep things interesting, Villiger Colorado is absolutely ideal for a variety of tastes and palates. Like an even draw and a perfect burn? Then this handmade is made for you. Boasting a Jalapa Colorado wrapper overtop a double binder combo from Esteli and Ometepe and a filler mix of carefully selected leaves from Nicaragua, this is one blend that you can count on. It received high marks from Cigar Aficionado, and it deftly proves that Villiger can do premium handmades just as well as the next guy.Stop the presses! Villiger Colorado has earned a well-deserved 91-point rating noting: ""Woody and sweet, this dark, medium-bodied robusto combines warm chocolate flavors with earth for a semi-sweet chocolate finish."" ",Medium,['Gordo'],"Habano, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan,Villiger
Villiger Cuellar Connecticut Kreme,,,"Creamy and delicious!Named for a conquistador, the Villiger Cuellar Connecticut Kreme is more like the guy next door spending his day lounging out in a hammock. A perfect premium for the everyday cigar enthusiast, it’s a blend of aged Dominican tobaccos with an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper to offer a creamy experience you can indulge in on the couch or hang out by the pool. This relaxing Villiger gives off notes of cashews, coffee with cream and a nudge of spice offering inviting aromas from the mellow to medium-bodied finish. Spend your weekend doing nothing but binge-watching your favorite Netflix show with a Cueller Kreme or start your work day off with one of these soothing cigars with your morning coffee.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Villiger
Villiger Culebras,Rated 3.33 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Two's company, three's a Culebra!Villiger Culebra has to be one of the strangest cigars I've ever seen, but it's uniqueness is much of the appeal....and it's surprisingly tasty too. This traditional Culebra - 3 cigars braided into one - is a little difficult to describe. So I'll just defer to some choice phrases from the manufacturer's description: 'plaited by female hands,' 'old Cuban tradition from fine and damp cigars.' That says it all right? Either way, they're something I'd suggest trying.  A rich and ultra-earthy blend with some interesting spice flavors. Untwist them, gather a couple friends, and you've got an instant herf!NOTE: The packaging below identifies the number of cigars. So, for instance, the pack of 6 contains two Culebras, with 3 cigars to each Culebra. The pack of 30 contains 5 packs, each containing two Culebras, for a total of 30 cigars.",Mellow-Medium,['Culebra'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,False,,Culebra,False,Sumatra,Villiger
Villiger Export,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 151 Ratings ,- Originated in Europe in 1888- Natural Sumatra wrapper- Box-pressed- 100% natural Cuban seed tobaccos- Rich and smooth with satisfying flavors- Made in Switzerland,Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,Yes,,Cigarillos,No,"Brazilian, Sumatra",Villiger
Villiger Kiel,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"Villiger's Kiel-ing the gameAre you looking for a constant companion to keep in your cigar rotation? Well, stop looking. Villiger Kiel is what you need. Originally produced in 1907 just shortly after the Villiger brand was created, it featured a goose quill mouthpiece so the tobacco never touches your mouth. Now replaced with a plastic cap this historic machine-made masterpiece is built to stand the test of time.Hailing from Switzerland these beauties are made with the finest Cuban-seed tobaccos, and you have your choice of a Sumatra natural or Brazilian Maduro wrapper around these rich and smooth premium cigars. Zesty Cuban flavor familiar to the rest of the Villiger line makes this a bold choice that anyone partial to a fuller bodied cigar will appreciate. A small cigar with bold flavor. ",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona']",,"Brazilian, Dominican, Indonesian, Italian, Nicaraguan, Varied",False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona",No,Indonesian,
Villiger La Flor de Ynclan,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Le Flor de What!? If you missed out on the La Flor De Ynclan back in 2007, don’t feel disappointed, because it’s back better than before. At the time Heinrich Villiger teamed up with now master blender Jose Matias Maragoto of ABAM cigar factory to craft this one-of-a-kind blend from two different men of two different backgrounds coming together for their love of tobacco. The first batch was close but no cigar, so they started over for the past decade!What more could you want from a cigar maker than dedication, hard work, and a premium tobacco product. You get just that from the La Flor De Ynclan. An Ecuadorian wrapper and Nicaraguan and Dominican fillers make up the powerhouse of flavor you experience with this handmade. You’re greeted with huge floral notes and citrus flavor that is followed up with cedar, sharp white pepper, and hints of cream to balance out the heat. With the Villiger La Flor De Ynclan, good things truly come to those who wait. Villiger La Flor de Ynclan was recently awarded an astounding 93-rating, and named the #10 Cigar of 2017. The reviews noted, ""sweet and charming from first puff to last, anchored by simple-yet-pleasing notes of chocolate and salt, and then refined by more precise intonations of walnut and orange marmalade."" ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Villiger
Villiger La Vencedora,Rated 4.3 out of 5,,"Villiger is the Champion… my friends…Villiger “La Vencedora”, or “The Champion” for all of us gringos out there, is the newest premium offering from Villiger Cigars, and this beaut is not to be missed. Best known around the world for their high-quality machine made products, Villiger also produces some great quality handmade blends, with La Vencedora being just one more ace up their sleeve. If you’ve been sleeping on this brand, now’s the time to wake up. A Nicaraguan puro made with choice tobaccos, this cigar weighs in right around a medium-body. Handmade at the famed Joya de Nicaragua factory, La Vencedora features a profile ripe with notes of smooth spice, rich complexity, and natural sweet tobacco flavors. Good news, Villiger La Vencedora has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Wrapped in a dark, clean cover leaf, this Churchill exhibits a palate of dried fruit from raisins and figs to apples and cherries. There's a bold underpinning of leather and cedar throughout.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan, Oscuro",Villiger
Villiger Mini Cigarillos,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,- Originated in Europe in 1888- Natural Sumatra wrapper- Your choice of sweet vanilla or natural- Quick and enjoyable for on-the-go- Cuban-seed tobaccos- Rich and smooth with satisfying flavors- Made in Germany​,Mellow-Medium,['Cigarillos'],,"Brazilian, United States",False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Sungrown, Indonesian",Villiger
Villiger Premium,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"They don't call it Villiger Premium for nothin'.Founded in 1888, the Swiss-made Villiger brand has been producing high-quality, European-style cigars for nearly 125 years. Their Premium No. 6 Series delivers exactly as promised....premium all the way through....and very affordable too. All three blends come covered with a smooth natural wrapper and each one features a plastic filter tip for ultimate comfort. Whichever blend you chose, you are always guaranteed a quick and smooth, premium experience. No. 6 Sumatra- Fillers from Zambia, Paraguay, and the Dominican Republic- Balanced and distinct aromatic flavorsNo. 6 Cherry- Fillers from Zambia, Paraguay, and the Dominican Republic- Sweet and tangy cherry flavorsNo. 6 Honey- Fillers from the Philippines, Italy, Indonesia, and Brazil- Rich and sweet honey flavors",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,No,Sumatra,Villiger
Villiger Premium Vanilla Cigarillos,Rated 5 out of 5,,- Originated in Europe in 1888- Natural Sumatra wrapper- Cuban-seed tobaccos- Rich and smooth with satisfying vanilla flavors- Made in Germany,Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Sumatra,Villiger
Villiger San 'Doro Claro,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"Gain some 'Clar'ityIf you liked the San ‘Doro Colorado and the San ‘Doro Maduro, try the San ‘Doro Claro. When you come home from the end of a long day, put your feet up and get comfy with one of the smoothest and relaxing cigars available today. This premium is ensconced in a lavish Ecuadorian Connecticut Habano wrapper and filled with top-of-the-line Nicaraguan tobaccos. You’ll get a kick of sweet and spicy flavors come through the Nicaraguan tobacco that is mellowed out by the high-flavored wrapper. Fire up a San ‘Doro Claro cigar and enjoy your downtime!",Medium,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Villiger
Villiger San 'Doro Maduro,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"Villiger is knocking on your 'DoroAre you on the lookout for a premium handmade cigar? Your search is over with the Villiger San ‘Doro Maduro. Why is it so special? This cigar is a Brazilian puro, made exclusively with an all-Brazilian blend! If you’re still skeptical, your worries will wash away when you hear the sweet features of this cigar. The name itself is a tribute to Christopher Columbus. San ‘Doro Maduro derives from Indorum Sana Sancta which means sacred herb of India. Many believed that Columbus discovered the trail to India, and the tobacco that he brought back was known as Indorum Sana Sancta. Brazilian Mata Norte filler is the perfect core of this cigar that is flawlessly covered in a dark Brazilian Mata Fina wrapper. What you get with that complementary combination, is medium-bodied rich, fruity goodness full of sweet flavors. Pair your San ‘Doro Maduro with an espresso, bourbon or IPA for a perfectly balanced taste on your palate. This Villiger is highly recommended for cigar enthusiasts who indulge in sugary confections. Sweet satisfaction.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Brazil,Brazilian,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Brazilian,Villiger
Villiger San'Doro Colorado,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"San'Don't miss out on this one
A Top 25 Cigar of 2016 and 2018, for good reason. Villiger San'Doro Colorado is a decadent morsel. It's balanced, with just enough kick to keep your interest the entire way through. Adorned with an Ecuadorian-grown Colorado-shade wrapper atop Nicaraguan long-fillers, Villiger San'Doro Colorado booms with notes of leather, cashew, and a slight hint of honey. Be sure to add this to your collection ASAP, as I'm sure they'll fly off the racks. Good news, Villiger San'Doro has earned a few noteworthy ratings, as high as 93-points, and landed at #15 on the Top 25 Cigars of 2018 list. One review noted: ""The cigar smokes evenly, delivering earthy, nutty impressions fortified by hearty notes of charred red meat.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Villiger
Villiger Selecto Connecticut,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"A great selectionAlthough Villiger is mainly known for their machine-made cigars, you’d be a fool to deny that these folks know how to craft a premium handmade. Need proof? I present Villiger Selecto, a Connecticut wrapped option that’s sure to be a palate pleaser. The flavor isn’t overly complex, just enough to keep things interesting, but the core profile is one you’ll most certainly enjoy. Slight cedar, toast, and warm aromas of baked bread keep Villiger Selecto at the top of my “would recommend” list, if you’re looking for a great bundled blend. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Villiger
Villiger Talanga,Rated 4 out of 5,,"When it comes to cigar making, it all comes down to leaf selection. I mean, obviously, right? That’s why blends like Villiger Talanga are so successful....when emphasis is placed on picking the perfect leaves, good things can happen. So expect to be thoroughly and swiftly satisfied with this offering from a brand that’s been around since 1888. Here’s an everyday cigar from Villiger that’s well-constructed and wrapped in a gorgeous Honduran Connecticut leaf. It’s sweet without overpowering, and includes a blend of three distinct varieties of fillers from Nicaragua. The binder is also Nicaraguan. Villiger Talanga will delight fans of mellow to medium-bodied handmades that are well-balanced and carefully constructed. It goes perfectly with a cup of coffee in the morning.Villiger Selecto cigars utilize tobaccos from both Honduras and Nicaragua, including a Talanga Connecticut wrapper hailing from Honduras, a Jalapa Habano binder, and a mix of Esteli Corojo, Ometepe Habano, and Condega Habano filler leaves. This quite a find, and it’s well worth a try.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Robusto']","Habano, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Robusto, Robusto",No,Honduran Connecticut,
Viva Republica Rapture Maduro,Rated 4.88 out of 5,,"A creation of darker proportionsA partnership with the oldest Dominican factory, La Aurora, created an impressive invention in cigars dubbed Rapture Maduro. The ultra-boutique brand is here and is as smooth as a Miles Davis tune. Rapture Maduro, dark and handsome, is the flagship line by Viva Republica, a cigar brand committed to contributing new ideas and innovations to an industry set in its ways of tradition. Rapture Maduro is composed of a four-country filler blend from Nicaragua, Brazil, Peru, and the Dominican Republic. This multifaceted and flavorful cigar is a must-try. A medium to full-bodied premium cloaked in a dark chocolate brown Mexican San Andres Maduro wrapper and held together by a Dominican Republic Corojo Ligero binder, Rapture Maduro eludes notes of chocolate, coffee, earth, and pepper. Give into the dark side of Rapture, and discover a smooth cigar experience. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,San Andres,
Viva Republica Rapture Natural,Rated 4.88 out of 5,,"A joyous rapture for these innovative cigarsCan you imagine life without some of the genius inventions we have today? It’s tough. Gutenberg’s printing press, Bell’s telephone, Edison’s light bulb and the cheesy goodness of delivery pizza. All are innovative ideas from great minds making life a little easier. Another great invention happens to be Rapture Natural by Viva Republica, a cigar crafted with the desire to bring new ideas to an industry steeped in tradition. Teaming up with the oldest factory in the Dominican, La Aurora, Viva Republica gained the resources to invent one-of-a-kind blends from top-quality tobaccos. Most small boutique cigar brands can’t even get their hands on these types of exotic leaves. As their flagship line, Rapture is masterfully crafted of a three-country filler blend from Nicaragua, Brazil, and the Dominican Republic, bound with a Dominican Corojo binder and finished with a gorgeous Ecuadorian Havana Vuelta Abajo wrapper. Enjoy the complex flavors of sugarcane, spice, fruit, earth, cedar, and bread from this medium to full-bodied cigar. Creamy and smooth from the start Rapture builds in strength and flavor ‘til the finish – a cigar that will keep your attention all the way til the end. ",Mellow-Medium,['Gordo'],Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,
Warped Corto,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Back at it again from NicaraguaWarped Cigars haven’t been in the game long, but they have already added a reputation to the brand. Producing cigars in the Casa Fernandez factory in Nicaragua and using a lot of Nicaraguan tobacco in their blends, they have created a line of flavorful medium to full-bodied cigars. The newest addition to the portfolio, the Warped Corto, is a limited edition release that will keep cigar enthusiasts in suspense. Each year a new size will be released and the old size retired, leaving each cigar on the market for only a year of enjoyment. This year, it’s a petite corona in 4.5’’ by 46 ring gauge size and its enjoyable right down to the nub. Crafted entirely of with Casa Fernandez signature Aganorsa tobaccos and proves to be a very complex and the fullest cigar to date that Warped has released. Nicaraguan long-fillers, Nicaraguan binder and an incredibly smooth, medium brown Nicaraguan wrapper in a Cuban box-pressed style makes for an enticing appearance. Rich tastes of coffee, leather and spice will hit your palate the whole way through. Stash a box of these feisty little suckers deep in your humidor because they won’t be available forever.",Full,['Petite Corona'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Petite Corona,No,Nicaraguan,Warped
Warped El Oso,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Tame the beast within.In case you couldn’t tell by the ursine-themed box and band, El Oso literally translates to “the bear.” It comes to us from Warped Cigars, a brand that originally hit the scene back in 2008 before disappearing from the radar. The year 2014 marked their epic comeback, and they did it with an array of tasty handmades that prove this brand is back with a vengeance. This fine specimen is dressed to impress, from its mix of Dominican and Nicaraguan filler leaves to its sultry Ecuadorian Habano wrapper. Just one glance is sure to intrigue. Light it up, and notes of leather, pepper, and cocoa blast your palate, followed closely by a hint of sweetness and a long, cool finished. Medium to full-bodied and exceptionally well-balanced, this cigar marks a triumphant return for the Warped Cigars brand.​",Medium-Full,['Lancero/Panatela'],,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Lancero/Panatela,No,Ecuador Habano,
Warped Futuro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The future is here.This new release is a collaboration between Warped cigars and Casa Fernandez. This cigar began with a simple premise, to produce a cigar with flavors and an experience unlike anything Warped or Casa Fernandez had done in the past.Futuro features 100% Nicaraguan Aganorsa tobacco from the Fernandez Aganorsa farms, and comes wrapped in a delectable Nicaraguan Corojo ’99 leaf atop a long-filler blend of Nicaraguan Criollo ’98 and Nicaraguan Corojo ’99. These tobaccos come from the Fernandez family “vault,” which houses their most prized tobacco. This medium to full-bodied gem features flavors of spice, pepper, leather, earth, and creamy cedar and will provide an elegant experience.​Good news, Warped Futuro Seleccion Suprema has received a 90-point rating, noting: “A well-made corona gorda with a three-seam cap. Chocolate and graham cracker notes are interspersed with touches of juniper and anise.”",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Toro",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Warped
Warped La Hacienda,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Let your senses get warped.Warped cigars does the industry a great service here by bringing back to life an old Cuban brand. La Hacienda was all but forgotten, but now it’s back and ready to bring you that same time-tested Cuban-esque flavor. And also happens to feature the largest size in any warped cigar…small in comparison to the rest of today’s market, but huge in flavor. Without further ado, welcome, Warped La Hacienda.Made at the revered Casa Fernandez factory in Nicaragua, this stellar blend features bold tobaccos all hailing from the volcanic rich soils of Nicaragua. Medium-bodied, La Hacienda plays host to refined nuances of dried fruit, nut, and citrus. This is one blend to be sure not to overlook, after finishing one in the office I wasted no time in making a greedy employee purchase that is now carefully stashed in the personal humidor.​",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,Warped
Warped Maestro del Tiempo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Flavor for days!Warped Cigars have been taking the world of the boutique by storm as of late. Already equipped with a 90-rating under their belt, Warped is primed for mainstream success, and they’ve only been around for a short period of time. Perfect time for them to reveal, arguably, their best blend to date. Enter, Maestro del Tiempo. This Nicaraguan puro calls on select tobaccos from the highly-regarded Casa Fernandez Aganorsa farms. A binder from Condega holds premium Corojo ’99 and Criollo ’98 long-fillers snuggly in place. Sitting proudly on top is a Corojo ’99 Clara wrapper from Jalapa. To say this prize is flavorful would be an understatement. A dead even medium body allows for prevalent notes of tangy raisin, cashew, and creamy vanilla to coat the palate. This is a cigar to plan a night around, so what are you waiting for?​",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Robusto",No,Corojo,
Warzone,Rated 4.47 out of 5,,"A masterpiece collaboration!
From the minds of industry veteran Erik Espinosa and the blending geniuses that brought you favorites like Punch, Macanudo and Cohiba, comes a collaboration that is sure to please your palate! Having never come across a Cameroon that satisified him, Erik Espinosa teamed up with Justin Andrews of General Cigar to create a Cameroon-wrapped cigar worthy of bearing a name referencing his own struggles as well as Cuba’s fight for independence from Spain, and “All that’s been hard-fought and won”. Available in only two sizes Warzone boasts a medium-bodied flavor profile. Utilizing a Honduran binder and fillers from both Nicaragua and Colombia beneath a beautiful Cameroon wrapper, this cigar has notes of leather, wood, nuts, and pepper that create a complex and delicious flavor that lasts. Originating out of Espinosa's La Zona Cigar Factory, production has been limited to just 3000 per year, so grab a box today and don't miss out!
Good news! Warzone has received an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""The wrapper of this well-made smoke glistens with oil. Floral first puffs segue into an exquisite balance of leather, almond and peanut with a touch of chocolate on the finish. The draw and burn are even throughout. Complex and delicious.""",,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Colombian, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Robusto, Toro",False,Cameroon,
White Heather by JC Newman,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 134 Ratings ,"The bush is back!In the early 1900’s, White Heather was an incredibly popular cigar. Manufactured by Cuesta Rey & Co. in Tampa, FL, the cigar had a huge fan base until it mysteriously disappeared in the mid 1950’s. Today, White Heather is back, and better than ever. And the even greater news is, when it comes to value on the dollar, this JC Newman-made comeback kid more than delivers.Coming from the makers of Diamond Crown and their PENSA factory in Nicaragua, the home of many 90+ rated blends including Brick House and El Baton, and best-selling fan-favorites like Quorum, this premium cigar contains a traditional ‘Cuban-sandwich’ style blend. With a beautiful Connecticut Shade wrapper and a handpicked selection of well-aged Nicaraguan fillers, expect an enjoyable mellow-bodied experience every time. The natural sweetness of the wrapper is balanced out by a slight spice, and, together, this blend easily stands up to the original. Ever wonder why everybody in classic movies constantly had a cigar in their mouth? It’s probably because they were enjoying a White Heather. And now, you can too. ​",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
White Owl Cigars,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"White Owl cigars are something to hoot about!White Owl cigars are legen-wait for it-dary. Dating back to 1887 these machine-made cigarillos provide a mellow yet flavorful and reliable blend of tobaccos from 5 countries, making it a perfect everyday cigar for all cigar lovers. The top-selling classic White Owl blunt cigars appeal to everyone with the variety of sizes and cigar flavors available. Keep things interesting and try White Owl Blue Raspberry, White Owl White Grape, White Owl Kiwi or White Owl White Peach in your rotation. ",Mellow,"['Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela']",,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Corona, Lancero/Panatela",Yes,HTL,
Wilde Cigars,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 59 Ratings ,"Wild thing! You make my heart sing!Excuse my little ode to the great pitcher Rick Vaughn, and let’s make way for some delicious quick sticks hailing from the same factory as the revered Aging Room line. Introducing Wilde Cigars, a mellow mixture of all Dominican tobaccos that work wonders when you’re crunched for time. Coming in two sizes, (cigarillo and panatela) these puppies are great for any length of lunch break, coffee break, or just kickin’ around in the yard.​",Mellow,['Lancero/Panatela'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Lancero/Panatela,No,Connecticut,
Wynwood Hills,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Back again, and completely “Unhinged” Originally debuting in 2012 as a collaboration between Christian Eiroa and Robert Caldwell, Wynwood Hills left the shelves when Caldwell went on to form his own company. Today, though, the brand has been revitalized, and we couldn’t be happier to welcome it back. Available in three unique blends, each packaged in cabinets of 50, every style of Wynwood Hills actually features a different makeup. Deranged – Ecaudorian Sumatra wrapper, with Dominican and Honduran long-fillers. Notes of chocolate, coffee, some spices, cedar, and a rich tobacco sweetnessMayhem – Honduran Corojo Puro. Balanced and creamy.Unhinged – Conencticut Broadleaf wrapper, Dominican and Honduran long-fillers. Though their make-ups are different, each cigar in the line delivers a medium to full-bodied profile loaded with the type of rich, sultry flavors that have been associated with Christian’s work across CLE and reaching back to the Camacho days of yore. ",Medium-Full,['Rothschild'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Rothschild,No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Corojo, Sumatra",
Zino Platinum Crown Series,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Strong, powerful, flavorful....Crown Series hits all the right adjectives.Filled to the brim with five-year-aged Dominican and Peruvian tobaccos, along with a 2-year aged Connecticut binder, this handmade is chock full of tasty tobaccos. But what's most impressive is the wrapper. A two-year-aged golden-brown Ecuadorian leaf with a gorgeous oily sheen. Expect a flavor that's both spicy and smooth, with hints of chocolate and vanilla swirled together nicely. Boasting a versatile profile, the Crown Series is strong enough for a vet, but just tame enough for a novice. Regardless of where you stand, after one taste you'll be back for seconds before in no time.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Connecticut,"Dominican, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Zino Red Mini Cigarillos,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Well-made using natural wrappers around an all-Dominican filler, these medium-bodied mini cigarillos are creamy with a touch of spice. The Zino Red Mini Cigarillos are a great option for a high-quality short experience.",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,Varies,,Cigarillos,Varies,Brazilian,
